Utah statutes.
20A-12-305 (Superseded 01/01/11).   Judicial retention election candidates
-- Financial reporting requirements -- Interim report.
(1)  The judge's personal campaign committee shall file an interim report with
the lieutenant governor no later than 5 p.m. on the date seven days before the
regular general election date.
(2)  Each interim report shall include the following information:
(a)  a detailed listing of each contribution received since the last summary
report;
(b)  for each nonmonetary contribution, the fair market value of the
contribution;
(c)  a detailed listing of each expenditure made since the last summary
report;
(d)  for each nonmonetary expenditure, the fair market value of the
expenditure; and
(e)  a net balance for the year consisting of all contributions since the last
summary report minus all expenditures since the last summary report.
(3) (a)  For all individual contributions of $50 or less, a single aggregate
figure may be reported without separate detailed listings.
(b)  Two or more contributions from the same source that have an aggregate
total of more than $50 may not be reported in the aggregate, but shall be
reported separately.
(4)  In preparing each interim report, all contributions and expenditures
shall be reported as of five days before the required filing date of the
report.
